West Virginia, session 2025, SB246.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. DANGEROUS WEAPONS. §61-7-18. Violent Crime Prevention Act. (a) West Virginia law-enforcement agencies shall submit required ballistics data to the National Integrated Ballistic Information Network (NIBIN) for any firearm that is alleged to have been used in connection with the following offenses:(1) A felony crime of violence against the person, as defined in §61-11-26(p)(3);(2) Domestic violence, as defined in §48-27-202; or(3) The distribution of a controlled substance pursuant to §60A-4-401 et seq..  (b) Data shall be submitted by a law enforcement agency within one month of a charge brought upon an individual in the above three categories.